test/src/morphology/V-langtw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - langtõ: # Verb 53 'eng /est langetada/fin' - full paradigm
     langtõ+V+Inf: langtõ
     langtõ+V+Ger: langtõs
     langtõ+V+Sup: langtõm
     langtõ+V+Sup+Ine: langtõmõs
     langtõ+V+Sup+Ela: langtõmõst
     langtõ+V+Sup+Tra: langtõmõks
     langtõ+V+Sup+Abe: langtõmõt
     langtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: langtõb
     langtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: langtõt
     langtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: langtõbõd
     langtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: langtiz
     langtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [langtizt, langtiztõ]
     langtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [langtizt, langtiztõ]
     langtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: langt
     langtõ+V+Cond+Sg3: langtõks
     langtõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: langt
     langtõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: langt
     langtõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: langtõgid
     langtõ+V+Jus+Sg3: langtõg
     langtõ+V+Quo+Sg3: langtiji
     langtõ+V+ActPrfPrc: langtõn
     langtõ+V+PssPrfPrc: langtõd
